Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-350
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Adult Protective Services Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 28-351 to 28-371 shall be used.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1055, § 2.
July 18, 2026